Utah statutes.
17C-2-107.   Urban renewal project area plan to be adopted by community
legislative body.
(1) An urban renewal project area plan approved by board resolution under
Section 17C-2-106 may not take effect until:
(a)  it has been adopted by ordinance of the legislative body of the community
that created the agency; and
(b)  notice under Section 17C-2-108 is provided.
(2)  Each ordinance under Subsection (1) shall:
(a)  be adopted by the community legislative body after the board's approval
of a resolution under Section 17C-2-106; and
(b)  designate the approved project area plan as the official urban renewal
plan of the project area.
